Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-207
Supervisors; first board; how constituted.

The county attorney, county clerk, and county treasurer shall forthwith appoint seven supervisors, who shall duly qualify and file their oath of office and bond with the county judge within ten days after such appointment.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 7, p. 133;

R.S.1913, § 993;

C.S.1922, § 893;

C.S.1929, § 26-207;

R.S.1943, § 23-207;

Laws 1947, c. 64, § 4, p. 211;

Laws 1979, LB 331, § 6.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).

Vacancies are filled by other members of board. State ex rel. Hunker v. West, 62 Neb. 461, 87 N.W. 176 (1901).